District of Columbia statutes.
10-731

Notice to be displayed on the tree.

Prior to the removal of a tree on the public land, unless the tree is dead or dangerous and in the need of immediate removal, the Department of Public Works, Tree and Landscape Division, shall provide a 7-day written notice, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, to be displayed on the tree, notwithstanding the notice requirement pursuant to § 6-804.

June 19, 2001, D.C. Law 13-314, § 2, 48 DCR 2076
District of Columbia fiscal management, capital improvements, authorization of lease-purchase financing, see § 1-204.90.
John A. Wilson Building, exclusive authority of the Council of the District of Columbia, see § 10-1301.
Public Parking Authority, acquisition of real property, see § 50-2509.